Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.270

Administrator of securities.

The director shall appoint a competent person to administer this chapter who shall be designated administrator of securities. The director shall delegate to the administrator such powers, subject to the authority of the director, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The administrator shall hold office at the pleasure of the director.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 27.]